Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 3. Nonresident Employers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Workmen's Compensation §§ 31 to 38.

99 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation §§ 22 to 25.

§ 27-14-301.
Applicability of provisions; reciprocity.

This act applies to all injuries and deaths occurring in Wyoming in employment described in W.S. 27-14-108(a), (d), (e), (j), (k) or (m) but applies to injuries and deaths occurring in Wyoming to employees of nonresident employers only if the worker’s compensation or similar law of the nonresident employer’s home state applies to all injuries and deaths occurring in that state or the nonresident employer’s home state and Wyoming have an active agreement under W.S. 27-14-306(d). This act applies to all injuries and deaths occurring outside of Wyoming in employment described in W.S. 27-14-108(a), (d), (e), (j), (k) or (m) under the following conditions:

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 2, § 2.

The employee at the time of the injury is working under a contract for hire made in Wyoming for employment by an employer who has a principal place of business within the state established for legitimate business-related purposes and the employment is within the United States, a United States territory, Canada or Mexico, but which is not principally localized in any other state, United States territory, Canada or Mexico; or

The employee at the time of the injury is working under a contract for hire made in Wyoming for employment principally localized in another state, United States territory, Canada or Mexico, the workers’ compensation law of which jurisdiction does not require that the employment be covered by a workers’ compensation insurance policy issued under the laws of that jurisdiction.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 2, § 2.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 29, § 1; 1997, ch. 177, § 1; 2006, ch. 2, §§ 1, 2; 2018 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, deleted “if the employment is principally localized in Wyoming” in the introductory language of (a); repealed former (a)(i), which read: “The employment is principally localized in Wyoming”; repealed former (b), pertaining to the description of the principle location of employment.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “but applies to injuries and deaths occurring in Wyoming to employees of nonresident employers only if the worker's compensation or similar law of the nonresident employer's home state applies to all injuries and deaths occurring in that state or the nonresident employer's home state and Wyoming have an active agreement under W.S. 27-14-306(d). This act applies” preceding “to all injuries” and made a stylistic change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Wyoming law not applicable. —

Colorado law applied to the plaintiff's injury, notwithstanding the plaintiff's contention that he worked from the headquarters of a subcontractor with its principal place of business in Wyoming, where he was hired at a Colorado site to perform duties solely at the Colorado site and there was nothing in the record to indicate that he had ever even been to the Wyoming office. Stuarte v. Colorado Interstate Gas Co., 130 F. Supp. 2d 1263, 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 551 (D. Wyo. 2001).

Where the plaintiff entered into his employment contract with a Wyoming company in Colorado and performed work under that contract only in Colorado, his employment was not principally localized in Wyoming, even though the company issued the plaintiff's paychecks and performed other administrative tasks related to his employment from its Wyoming office and had no other place of business. Stuart v. Colo. Interstate Gas Co., 271 F.3d 1221, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 25246 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2001).

Principal location. —

Claimant's employment was principally located in Wyoming such that he was entitled to benefits where (1) the employer occupied a fixed premises at the job site in a trailer that had been placed there for a substantial duration; (2) the employer had a recognizable physical and mailing address as evidenced by maintenance of a post office box; (3) there were a secretary, a telephone, and a facsimile machine on site; and (4) the employer regularly conducted its ancillary business from the trailer. The employer's election not to obtain coverage was not determinative of whether the claimant was entitled to benefits. Kunkle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 49, 109 P.3d 887,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2005) (decided prior to 2006 amendment).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Compensability of specially equipped van or vehicle under workers' compensation statutes, 63 ALR5th 163.

§ 27-14-302.
Required reporting; security required for certain nonresident employers.

Nonresident employers before starting work, and from time to time after the work has been commenced, shall report to the director the nature and progress of the work, the location of the work and the number of employees engaged in and upon the work and likely to be so engaged for the next thirty (30) days, giving further and detailed information as the director may reasonably demand.

Before starting business or engaging work in this state, a nonresident employer as defined by W.S.

27-1-106

(a) shall register as required by W.S.

27-14-207

, and shall either pay an advance premium deposit as provided in the department’s rules and regulations or shall file with the director a surety bond or other security approved by the director, as provided in W.S.

27-1-106

.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 93, § 2.

The requirements of this section shall be waived if the nonresident employer provides a certificate of coverage pursuant to W.S. 27-14-306(b).

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 29, § 1; 1991, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 163, § 1; 2006, ch. 2, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted the registration and deposit requirements in (b) and added (e).

Cited

in

Kunkle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 49, 109 P.3d 887,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(2005).

§ 27-14-303.
Contract with nonresident conditioned upon compliance.

A contract shall not be let to a nonresident employer for work or services within the state until the contributions provided by this act have been paid.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Cited

in

Kunkle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 49, 109 P.3d 887,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(2005).

§ 27-14-304.
Return of deposit to nonresident employer after cessation of operations.

Money, bonds or other security deposited pursuant to this act shall be returned to the nonresident employer in accordance with W.S.

27-1-106

.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1993, ch. 163, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-305.
Secretary of state designated agent for service of process.

Nonresident employers upon engaging in any covered employment, unless they designate a resident agent for service of process, shall be deemed from the date of the commencement of work to have designated the secretary of state as their agent for service of any process upon them in any action prosecuted pursuant to this act. The secretary of state upon the receipt of any process shall send the process by certified or registered mail return receipt requested to the last known address of the employer.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-306.
Extraterritorial applicability of provisions; reciprocity.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 177, § 2.

A certificate from an authorized officer of the worker’s compensation department or similar agency of another state certifying that an employer of that state is bound by the worker’s compensation or similar law of that state and the law will be applied to employees of the employer while in this state, is prima facie evidence of the application of the worker’s compensation or similar law of the certifying state. This subsection shall apply only when the certifying state accepts Wyoming worker’s compensation certification as prima facie evidence of the application of Wyoming worker’s compensation or similar law or when the certifying state and Wyoming have an active agreement under subsection (d) of this section.

The benefits under this act or similar laws of the other state that are received by the employee for an injury sustained while working for the employer in this state are the exclusive remedy against the employer and coemployees acting within the scope of their employment for an injury whether or not that injury resulted in death.

Upon approval of the governor, the division shall enter into an agreement with any worker’s compensation division or similar agency of another state to promulgate regulations not inconsistent with this act to carry out the extraterritorial application of the worker’s compensation or similar law of the agreeing state.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 29, § 1; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; 1997, ch. 177, § 2; 2018 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), added
the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Applied in

State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 111, 384 P.3d 267,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2016).

Cited

in

Salt Creek Welding, Inc. v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 897 P.2d 1306,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 27-14-307.
Penalty for failure to post bond.

The willful failure of any nonresident employer in a covered employment to give bond or other security required by this act constitutes a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.